California, session 20252026, AB2436.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 68083 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 972 of the Statutes of 2022, is amended to read:68083. (a) Any Team USA student athlete who trains in the state in an elite level program approved by the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee is entitled to resident classification for tuition and fee purposes until the athlete has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident.(b) The student athlete shall certify their participation in an Olympic or Paralympic elite level training program through supporting documentation from the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee verifying eligibility, and shall submit the supporting documentation to the campus they are attending at the California State University, University of California, or California Community Colleges.(c) For purposes of this section, “Team USA student athlete” means any student athlete who meets the eligibility standards defined and approved by the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee and by the national governing body for the sport in which the athlete competes.(d)This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2032, and, as of January 1, 2033, is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 68083 of the Education Code, as added by Section 2 of Chapter 972 of the Statutes of 2022, is repealed.68083.(a)Any amateur student athlete in training at the United States Olympic Training Center in the City of Chula Vista is entitled to resident classification for tuition purposes until the student athlete has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident.(b)For purposes of this section, “amateur student athlete” means any student athlete who meets the eligibility standards established by the national governing body for the sport in which the athlete competes.(c)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2032.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2 and 3.___________________